Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-333 Priority of certain liens
arising by operation of law. (a) In this section, "possessory
lien" means an interest, other than a security interest or an agricultural
lien:

(1) Which secures payment or performance of an
obligation for services or materials furnished with respect to goods by a
person in the ordinary course of the person's business;

(2) Which is created by statute or rule of law in
favor of the person; and

(3) Whose effectiveness depends on the person's
possession of the goods.

(b) A possessory lien on goods has priority
over a security interest in the goods unless the lien is created by a statute
that expressly provides otherwise. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next